Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5384.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4667. (1) An association, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, a trust, or other business entity may be a participant in a sponsored captive insurance company authorized pursuant to under this chapter. (2) A sponsor may be a participant in a sponsored captive insurance company. (3) A participant does not need not to be a shareholder of the sponsored captive insurance company or an affiliate of the company. (4) A participant shall insure only its own risks or the risks of its affiliates or controlled unaffiliated businesses through a sponsored captive insurance company, unless otherwise approved by the commissioner.director.